Arkansas, session 2025, SB378.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-50-102(b), concerning training activities
under the Arkansas Industry Training Program, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) Permissible training under subsection (a) of this section
includes without limitation:
(A)(1) Upgrading skills and abilities of workers to
operate modern, more sophisticated equipment;
(B)(2) Providing workers with skills needed for initiating
more modern processes and using more sophisticated materials; and
(C)(3) Other situations which create a technical-upgrade
training need of employees.
(2) The commission shall prepare a quarterly report detailing
its training activities and submit that report to the Governor and the
*JLL261*
03/05/2025 9:59:44 AM JLL261

SB378
Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint
Budget Committee.


































03/05/2025 9:59:44 AM JLL261